Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-356
Sections, how construed; limitation on granted powers.

None of the provisions of sections 31-301 to 31-369 shall be construed as repealing or in anywise modifying the provisions of any other law relating to the subject of draining, reclaiming or protecting swamp, overflowed or submerged lands. Nothing herein contained shall be deemed to authorize any person or persons to divert the waters of any river, creek, stream, canal or ditch from its channel to the detriment of any person or persons having any interest in such river, creek, stream, canal or ditch, or the waters therein, unless previous compensation be ascertained and paid therefor, under the laws of this state authorizing the taking of private property for public use.

Laws 1905, c. 161, § 25, p. 630;

R.S.1913, § 1851;

C.S.1922, § 1798;

C.S.1929, § 31-455;

R.S.1943, § 31-356.